Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB643.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5522DP (2) 91 ss/ns S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 68A.407 Synthetic media ââ 1 disclosure. 2 1. For purposes of this section: 3 a. âSynthetic mediaâ means an image, audio recording, or 4 video recording of an individualâs appearance, speech, or 5 conduct that has been intentionally manipulated with the use 6 of any form of digital technology in a manner to create a 7 realistic but false image, audio recording, or video recording 8 that produces any of the following: 9 (1) A depiction of an individual in appearance, speech, or 10 conduct that a reasonable individual would believe depicts a 11 real individual. 12 (2) A materially different understanding or impression than 13 a reasonable individual would have from the unaltered, original 14 version of the image, audio recording, or video recording. 15 b. âSynthetic mediaâ does not include content created 16 using digital technology solely for text generation, grammar 17 correction, spelling checks, stylistic editing, or enhancing 18 existing content without creating a new impersonation of a 19 human likeness or voice. 20 2. Published material, as defined in section 68A.405, that 21 contains synthetic media must prominently include the words 22 âTHIS CONTENT GENERATED USING SYNTHETIC MEDIAâ. The person 23 who is responsible for the published material has the sole 24 responsibility and liability for inclusion of the disclosure 25 required by this subsection. 26 3. The inclusion of the disclosure required by this section 27 does not preclude a person from pursuing any other remedies 28 under law for the publication of synthetic media. 29 4. The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 30 implement this section. 31